hr-HR: Uzorak jedinice za slanje goriva u spremniku plovila: Međunarodno / europsko s 5 rupa; Nije primjenjivo (nema osjetnika); SAE s 3 vijka; SAE s 5 vijaka (standardni pomorski); Uzorak Wema / ISO; Ostalo
vi: sơ đồ bộ phận cảm biến bình nhiên liệu tàu thuyền: Quốc tế/Châu Âu 5 lỗ; Không áp dụng (không có bộ phận gửi tín hiệu); SAE 3 bu-lông; SAE 5 bu-lông (tiêu chuẩn hàng hải); Mẫu Wema/ISO; Khác
th: รูปแบบหน่วยส่งสัญญาณระดับน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิงของเรือ: 5 รู แบบสากล/ยุโรป; ไม่มี (ไม่มีการรองรับตัวส่งสัญญาณ); สลักเกลียว 3 ตัวมาตรฐาน SAE; สลักเกลียว 5 ตัวมาตรฐาน SAE (มาตรฐานเรือ); รูปแบบ Wema/ISO; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vzorec senzorja nivoja goriva (plovca) rezervoarja plovila: Mednarodno/evropsko s 5 luknjami; Ni uporabno (brez priprave za dajalnik); SAE s 3 vijaki; SAE s 5 vijaki (standardno pomorsko); Vzorec Wema/ISO; Drugo
tr: Deniz aracı yakıt depo sensörü montaj deseni: Uluslararası/Avrupa 5 delikli; Geçerli değil (gösterge girişi yok); SAE 3 cıvatalı; SAE 5 cıvatalı (standart marin); Wema/ISO deseni; Diğer
pt-PT: Padrão da unidade emissora do depósito de combustível da embarcação: Padrão internacional/europeu de 5 furos; Não aplicável (sem provisão de emissor); SAE de 3 parafusos; SAE de 5 parafusos (marítimo padrão); Padrão Wema/ISO; Outro
cs: Typ uchycení palivového snímače v nádrži plavidla: Mezinárodní/evropský (5 otvorů); Nelze použít (bez přípravy pro snímač); SAE (3 šrouby); SAE (5 šroubů, standardní lodní); Vzor Wema/ISO; Jiné
sv: Bränsletankssändare för vattenfarkoster – mönster: Internationell/europeisk 5-håls; Ej tillämpligt (ingen förberedelse för givare); SAE 3-bult; SAE 5-bult (marin standard); Wema/ISO-mönster; Övrigt
en: Watercraft fuel tank sending unit pattern: International/European 5-hole; Not applicable (no sender provision); SAE 3-bolt; SAE 5-bolt (standard marine); Wema/ISO pattern; Other
fr: Schéma de fixation de la sonde de niveau du réservoir d’embarcation: 5 trous international/européen; Sans objet (sans jauge); SAE 3 boulons; SAE 5 boulons (standard marine); Norme Wema/ISO; Autre
sk-SK: Vzor jednotky na odosielanie palivovej nádrže plavidla: Medzinárodný/európsky 5-dierový; Nerelevantné (bez prípravy na snímač); SAE 3-skrutkový; SAE 5-skrutkový (štandardný lodný); Vzor Wema/ISO; Iné
bg-BG: Тип монтажен модел на датчик за резервоар на плавателен съд: Международен/европейски с 5 отвора; Не е приложимо (без опция за сензор); SAE с 3 болта; SAE с 5 болта (стандартен морски); Wema/ISO стандарт; Други
da: Monteringsmønster for tankmålergiver til fartøj: Internationalt/europæisk med 5 huller; Ikke relevant (ingen klargøring til måler); SAE med 3 bolte; SAE med 5 bolte (standard marine); Wema/ISO-mønster; Andet
pt-BR: Embarcação padrão da unidade de envio do tanque de combustível: Padrão europeu/internacional de 5 furos; Não se aplica (sem provisão de medidor); SAE com 3 parafusos; SAE com 5 parafusos (marítimo padrão); Padrão Wema/ISO; Outros
de: Montagemuster der Kraftstofftank-Gebereinheit für Wasserfahrzeuge: Internationales/Europäisches 5-Loch-Muster; Nicht zutreffend (kein Geberanschluss); SAE 3-Loch; SAE 5-Loch (Marine-Standard); Wema-/ISO-Muster; Sonstige
ko: 선박 연료 탱크 센더 유닛 패턴: 국제/유럽 규격 5홀; 해당 없음(센더 장치 없음); SAE 3볼트; SAE 5볼트(해양 표준); Wema/ISO 패턴; 기타
nl: Watervaartuig brandstoftankzender patroon: Internationaal/Europees 5-gats; Niet van toepassing (geen sensorvoorziening); SAE 3-bouts; SAE 5-bouts (standaard maritiem); Wema/ISO-patroon; Overige
es: Patrón de montaje de los sensores de nivel del tanque de combustible de la embarcación: Internacional/europeo de 5 orificios; No aplicable (sin provisión para transmisor); SAE de 3 pernos; SAE de 5 pernos (marino estándar); Patrón Wema/ISO; Otro
fi: Vesikulkuneuvon polttoainesäiliön anturiyksikön kuvio: Kansainvälinen/Eurooppalainen 5-reikäinen; Ei sovellu (ei anturivalmiutta); SAE 3-pulttinen; SAE 5-pulttinen (meristandardi); Wema/ISO-kuvio; Muu
pl: Układ czujnika poziomu paliwa zbiornika jednostki pływającej: 5-otworowe europejskie/międzynarodowe; Nie dotyczy (brak miejsca na czujnik); 3-śrubowe SAE; 5-śrubowe SAE (standard marynistyczny); Wema/ISO; Inne
el: Μοτίβο μονάδας αποστολής δεξαμενής καυσίμου σκάφους: Διεθνές/Ευρωπαϊκό 5 οπών; Δεν ισχύει (χωρίς υποδοχή αισθητήρα); SAE 3 βιδών; SAE 5 βιδών (τυπικό ναυτικό); Μοτίβο Wema/ISO; Άλλο
it: Schema del sensore di livello del carburante del serbatoio del natante: A 5 fori internazionale/europeo; Non applicabile (nessuna predisposizione trasmettitore); SAE a 3 bulloni; SAE a 5 bulloni (standard marino); Schema Wema/ISO; Altro
ro-RO: Modelul unității de transmisie a rezervorului de combustibil pentru ambarcațiuni: Internațional/European cu 5 orificii; Nu se aplică (fără spațiu pentru sondă); SAE cu 3 șuruburi; SAE cu 5 șuruburi (standard marin); Model Wema/ISO; Altele
zh-TW: 船艇油箱感測器孔距: 國際/歐洲 5 孔; 不適用 (無感測器配置); SAE 3 螺栓; SAE 5 螺栓 (標準船用); Wema/ISO 規格; 其他
nb: Mønster for nivåføleren i båtens drivstofftank: Internasjonalt/europeisk mønster med 5 hull; Ikke aktuelt (ingen giverforberedelse); SAE 3-bolt; SAE 5-bolt (standard marine); Wema-/ISO-mønster; Annet
zh-CN: 船舶油箱传感器模式: 国际/欧洲 5 孔; 不适用（无传感器预留位）; SAE 3 螺栓; SAE 5 螺栓（标准船用）; Wema/ISO 孔位; 其他
ja: 水上バイク燃料タンクセンディングユニットパターン: 国際/欧州5穴; 該当なし (センダー用スペースなし); SAE 3ボルト; SAE 5ボルト (標準船舶用); Wema/ISOパターン; その他
lt-LT: Vandens transporto priemonės degalų bako siuntimo bloko schema: Tarptautinis / Europos 5 skylių; Netaikoma (nėra siųstuvo jungties); SAE 3 varžtų; SAE 5 varžtų (standartinis jūrinis); WEMA / ISO šablonas; Kita
ru: Шаблон датчика топливного бака водного транспорта: Международный/европейский стандарт (5 отверстий); Неприменимо (нет разъема для датчика); SAE (3 болта); SAE (5 болтов, морской стандарт); Стандарт Wema/ISO; Другое
hu: Vízi jármű üzemanyagtartály-jeladó mintázata: Nemzetközi/európai 5-lyukas; Nem alkalmazható (nincs jeladó); SAE 3-csavaros; SAE 5-csavaros (szabványos tengeri); Wema/ISO minta; Egyéb